Idaho, session 2026, S1453.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 25, Title 56, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 25
IDAHO RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION PROGRAM
56-2501. IDAHO RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION FUND.(1) There is hereby
created and established in the state treasury the Idaho rural health trans-
formation fund. The fund shall consist of moneys received by the state of
Idaho from the federal rural health transformation program grant. Moneys in
the fund shall be used solely for federally approved rural health transfor-
mation program purposes, subject to appropriation by the legislature upon
recommendation from the rural health transformation committee as estab-
lished in section 56-2502, Idaho Code.
(2) The Idaho rural health transformation fund shall be subject to an-
nual public reporting of all receipts and expenditures.
56-2502. RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION COMMITTEE.(1) There is hereby
created the rural health transformation committee, hereafter referred to
as the committee. The committee shall consist of nine (9) members to be
appointed as follows: four (4) members of the senate shall be appointed by
the president pro tempore of the senate, one (1) of whom shall be cochair of
the committee; four (4) members of the house of representatives shall be ap-
pointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, one (1) of whom shall
be cochair of the committee; and one (1) nonvoting member shall be selected
by the governor. The term of a legislative member of the committee shall
coincide with the term of election to the legislature. A vacancy during the


term of a member of the committee shall be filled by the appointing authority
of that member, and members may be reappointed to a subsequent term.
(2) The committee shall have the following powers and duties:
(a) To establish rules for governance and operation of committee pro-
ceedings;
(b) To establish any additional requirements for funding subawards,
which shall include application scoring rubrics, for the first award
year and by September 30 for the four (4) remaining award years;
(c) To establish an expedited award review process with the department
of health and welfare for funding subawards. The award review process
shall align with federally approved timelines as outlined in Idaho's
rural health transformation plan;
(d) To receive no less than quarterly updates on progress toward funded
projects, expenditures, and outcomes from the department of health and
welfare;
(e) To evaluate the potential and actual success of programs funded
with moneys from the Idaho rural health transformation fund;
(f) To retain oversight of moneys in the Idaho rural health transforma-
tion fund;
(g) To require a sustainability plan for any initiative funded by Idaho
rural health transformation moneys; and
(h) To make any recommendations to the legislature on the use of funds,
as long as recommendations are within the parameters of the federally
approved Idaho plan.
(3) The committee shall remain active until all moneys in the Idaho ru-
ral transformation fund have been appropriated and expended.
(4) The committee shall have access to all data regarding rural health
transformation program awards received or created by the department of
health and welfare, including but not limited to scoring data, rubrics, and
reporting information. Such data shall be readily accessible through a se-
cure portal, website, shared drive, or other method providing instantaneous
or real-time access.
SECTION 2. In addition to the appropriation in Section 1, Chapter 209,
Laws of 2025, there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and
Welfare for the Division of Indirect Support Services from the Idaho Rural
Health Transformation Fund, the following amounts to be expended for the
designated expense classes, for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $264,300
Operating Expenditures 3,444,500
Capital Outlay 28,800
TOTAL $3,737,600
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Division of Indirect Support


Services is increased by twelve (12.00) for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Division of Indirect Support Services from the Idaho Rural Health Transfor-
mation Fund, the following amounts to be expended for the designated expense
classes, for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $1,328,700
Operating Expenditures 294,076,500
TOTAL $295,405,200
SECTION 5. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Division of Indirect Support
Services is increased by twelve (12.00) for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION PROGRAM -- SCOPE OF PRACTICE
COMMITMENTS. It is the intent of the Legislature that the State of Idaho con-
tinue to pursue the scope of practice reforms for physician assistants and
dental hygienists that were identified in the Rural Health Transformation
Program proposal submitted to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
and that contributed to the state's program scoring and award determination.
The Department of Health and Welfare shall report to the Joint Finance-Ap-
propriations Committee and the germane policy committees on the status of
efforts to advance those reforms, including legislative or administrative
actions taken during the prior year and any additional steps necessary to
fulfill those commitments.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall be in full force and
effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 4 through 6 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.